nl: Versnellingsverhoudingstype: Riem; Ketting; Kettingloos; Andere
cs: Typ pohonu: Pásová; Řetěz; Bez řetězu; Jiné
pl: Typ mechanizmu przekładni: Pas; Łańcuszkowy; Bezłańcuchowy; Inne
sv: Växeltyp: Bälte; Kedja; Kedjelös; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta prijenosnika: Pojas; Lanac; Bez lanca; Ostalo
en: Gearing type: Belt; Chain; Chainless; Other
ko: 기어링 유형: 벨트; 체인; 체인리스; 기타
it: Tipo di ingranaggio: Cintura; Catena; Senza catena; Altro
lt-LT: Pavaros tipas: Diržas; Grandinė; Be grandinės; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de engrenagem: Cinto; Corrente; Sem corrente; Outro
bg-BG: Тип скоростна система: Колан; Верига; Без верига; Други
ro-RO: Tip de angrenaj: Curea; Lanț; Fără lanț; Altele
ru: Тип зубчатой передачи: Ремень; Цепь; Без цепи; Другой
nb: Girtype: Belte; Kjede; Kjedeløs; Annet
da: Gearingstype: Bælte; Kæde; Kædefri; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de engrenagens: Cinto; Corrente; Sem corrente; Outro
vi: Loại ăn khớp: Máy chà nhám băng; Xích; Không có xích; Khác
ja: ギアタイプ: ベルト; チェーン; チェーンレス; その他
zh-CN: 传动装置类型: 带式; 链式戒指; 无链式; 其他
el: Τύπος γραναζιών: Ζώνη; Αλυσίδα; Χωρίς αλυσίδα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ prevodovky: Opasok; Reťaz; Bez reťaze; Iné
es: Tipo de transmisión: Cinturón; Cadena; Sin cadena; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta prestavnega sistema: Pas; Veriga; Brez verige; Drugo
de: Getriebetyp: Band; Kette; Ohne Kette; Sonstiges
hu: Hajtásrendszer típusa: Szíj; Lánc; Lánc nélküli; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการทดเกียร์: สายพานขัด; แหวนโซ่; ไม่มีโซ่; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 傳動裝置類型: 腰帶; 鏈條; 無鏈式; 其他
fi: Vaihteistotyyppi: Vyö; Ketju; Ketjuton; Muu
tr: Dişli Tipi: Kemer; Zincir; Zincirsiz; Diğer
fr: Type d’engrenage: A bande; Chaîne; Sans chaîne; Autre